Louisiana, session 2026, HB1216.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1312(1), (3), (4),(6) through (12), and (14) and
1313(A)(introductory paragraph) and (B)(2) through (6), 1314(C)(1)(a) through (d),
(e)(introductory paragraph) and (i), (f), and (g), 1315(A)(2), (3), (10), (11), (14), and (15),
1318(A), (B)(1), (C), (D), and (E), 1320, 1321(A)(1) and (3), (B), (C), (D), 1322, 1323(A)(1)
and (2), (B), (C), (D)(introductory paragraph), (E)(1), and (F)(introductory paragraph), 1324,
1325, 1336(A)(introductory paragraph), (1), (10)(introductory paragraph) and (a), (B), and
(C), and 1327, are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 37:1312(16) through (19),
1313(B)(7), 1321(A)(1)(d), and 1326(A)(10)(g) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1312. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings, unless
the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Approved school" or "training program" means an accredited school
or training program approved by the committee and the board which offers
instruction in any area of the practice of clinical laboratory science approved by the
committee and the board.
* * *
(3) "Clinical cytotechnology cytology" means the microscopic study or
examination of body fluids, tissues, or cells desquamated from a body surface or
lesion for the practice of clinical laboratory science, including but not limited to
detecting malignancy and microbiologic changes and the measurement of hormonal
levels.
(4) "Clinical laboratory" means any building, place, or facility in which an
operation and procedure for the biological, microbiological, serological,
immunological, chemical, immunohematological, hematological, biophysical,
cytological, pathological, or other examinations of materials derived from the human
body is performed to provide information for the diagnosis, prevention, or treatment
Page 2 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
of any disease or impairment of, or the assessment of the health of human beings or
for forensic testing. These examinations include, but are not limited to, procedures
to determine, measure, or otherwise describe the presence or absence of various
substances or organisms in the human body. A facility which only collects or
prepares specimens, or both, or only serves as a mailing service and does not perform
on site testing is not a clinical laboratory. A laboratory that performs workplace drug
testing shall be covered under this definition unless such testing is specifically
excluded from coverage under the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments
of 1988 and regulations promulgated thereunder.
* * *
(6) "Clinical Medical laboratory scientist-generalist scientist" or " CLS-G
MLS" means an individual who performs clinical laboratory tests and procedures in
all specialty areas of a clinical laboratory which require the exercise of independent
judgment and responsibility, including but not limited to the performance of all
laboratory tests as stated in the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of
1988 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. The clinical
medical laboratory scientist-generalist scientist may perform the functions of all
categories licensed in this Part with the exception of the cytotechnologist cytologist.
(7) " Clinical Medical laboratory scientist-specialist scientist categorical" or
" CLS-S MLS" means an individual performing clinical laboratory science in one or
more laboratory specialties and who performs functions limited directly related to
such particular laboratory specialty or specialties as provided for in this Part or in
rules and regulations adopted by the board as recommended by the committee. The
clinical laboratory scientist-specialist may perform the functions of the laboratory
assistant and the phlebotomist without additional licensure or certification.
(8) " Clinical Medical laboratory scientist-technician technician" or " CLS-T
MLT" means an individual who performs medical laboratory tests and procedures
of high and moderate complexity as defined in 42 Code of Federal Regulations Part
493 et seq., which do not require the exercise of independent judgment or
Page 3 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
responsibility within any area of clinical laboratory science. The medical laboratory
technician may perform the functions of all categories of clinical laboratory
personnel licensed and certified in accordance with the Part except those of a
cytologist. The clinical laboratory scientist-technician shall perform tests and
procedures of high complexity under supervision as defined in the Clinical
Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 and the rules and regulations
promulgated pursuant thereto. The clinical laboratory scientist-technician may
perform the functions of the laboratory assistant and the phlebotomist without
additional licensure or certification.
(9) "Committee" means the Clinical Laboratory Personnel Advisory
Committee to the Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners established by R.S.
37:1314.
(10) "Cytotechnologist Cytologist" means an individual responsible for
examining cytopathological preparations which require the exercise of independent
judgment and responsibility.
(11) "Laboratory assistant" or "LA" means an individual who performs
medical waived and moderate complexity laboratory tests and procedures under
supervision by a licensed health care provider or laboratory director as defined in 42
Code of Federal Regulations Part 493 et seq. These medical laboratory tests and
procedures performed by the laboratory assistant do not require the exercise of
independent judgment or responsibility within any area of clinical laboratory science.
The laboratory assistant may not perform high complexity tests under supervision
as stated in the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 ("CLIA")
and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.
(12) "Nationally recognized certification examination" means an
examination approved by the board upon the recommendation of the committee.
administered by an agency that is nationally accredited, or in the absence thereof, an
examination approved by the board.
* * *
Page 4 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
(14) "Practice of clinical laboratory science" means the performance by any
individual, other than a physician licensed by the board, of laboratory testing,
instrument operation, analysis, or examination of human specimens.
* * *
(16) "Laboratory specialty" means any category or subcategory recognized
as a specialty by a certifying agency for the category of medical laboratory
scientist-categorical, including but not limited to the categories of hematology,
microbiology, chemistry, and immunohematology.
(17) "Trainee" means an individual who has not fulfilled the educational
requirements to take an approved nationally recognized certification examination or
who needs to obtain full-time comprehensive experience under supervision, or a
returning practitioner as provided for by rule. A trainee is not allowed to report
results.
(18) "Temporary permit" means a permit for a graduate of a National
Accrediting Agency for Clinical Laboratory Sciences accredited program who has
not successfully passed the national certification examination who is eligible for
employment and training and is allowed to report results.
(19) "Waived test" means routine technical procedures performed under or
eligible for a certificate of waiver under CLIA.
§1313. Exemptions to licensure or permit
A. This Part shall apply to clinical laboratory personnel performing the
practice of clinical laboratory science in a clinical laboratory in this state except
those practicing in exclusively and in the course and scope of their employment by
either:
* * *
B. This Part shall not apply to:
* * *
(2) Any individual working under the direction and supervision of such a
physician in an operating room, theater, emergency room, or intensive care unit Any
Page 5 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
respiratory therapist acting within the scope of performance of the practice of
respiratory therapy.
(3) Any pulmonary function technician acting within the scope of
performance of the practice of respiratory therapy Any clinical perfusionist acting
within the scope of practice of perfusion in the support, treatment, measurement, or
supplementation of the cardiopulmonary and circulatory system of an individual
patient.
(4) Any clinical perfusionist acting within the scope of practice of perfusion
in the support, treatment, measurement, or supplementation of the cardiopulmonary
and circulatory system of an individual patient Any individual whose duties include
only the performance of routine technical procedures under or eligible for a
certificate of waiver in accordance with 42 Code of Federal Regulations Part 493 et
seq., whether performed in a physician's office laboratory, a hospital's clinical
laboratory or at the point of care, and which do not require the exercise of
independent judgment or responsibility.
(5) Any individual licensed as a health care provider. Any individual
performing phlebotomy or acting as a phlebotomist employed by or acting under the
direction and supervision of a physician licensed by the board or employed by one
of the following:
(a) A clinic operated by a licensed health care provider.
(b) A hospital, a nursing home, or other licensed health care facility.
(6) Any other licensed allied health care professional Any individual whose
duties may include demonstrating or instructing, or both, the use of any automated
or digital instrument, device, machine, or similar mechanical equipment and related
procedures utilized to assist in the practice of clinical laboratory science, provided
the results furnished by such equipment during such a demonstration or instruction
are not used in the diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment of human disease or disorder.
Page 6 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
(7) Any individual performing forensic testing and examinations of body
fluids, tissues, cells, or blood solely for the purpose of law enforcement and the
state's criminal justice system.
§1314. Clinical Laboratory Personnel Committee; creation; membership;
qualification; appointment; term; vacancy; officers; meetings; reimbursement
* * *
C.(1) The governor shall appoint ten members of the committee, subject to
Senate confirmation, as follows:
(a) One clinical medical laboratory scientist-generalist scientist, who has
been employed in a supervisory or administrative capacity.
(b) One clinical medical laboratory scientist-generalist scientist, who has
been actively engaged in clinical laboratory science education.
(c) One clinical medical laboratory scientist-generalist scientist, not holding
a degree above the baccalaureate level.
(d) One clinical medical laboratory scientist-technician technician.
(e) One clinical medical laboratory scientist-specialist scientist categorical
appointed from a list of four names compiled by the submission of two names from
each of the following two organizations:
(i) Louisiana Society for Clinical Laboratory Science or its successor.
* * *
(f) One clinical medical laboratory scientist-generalist scientist who is in a
supervisory or administrative capacity appointed from a list of three names submitted
by the Louisiana Hospital Association.
(g) One cytotechnologist cytologist appointed from a list of three names
submitted by the Clinical Laboratory Personnel Association.
* * *
§1315. Powers and duties of the committee
A. The committee shall:
Page 7 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
(2) As the administrative, technical, and specialty committee of the board,
examine and recommend that the board license or certify, renew a license of or
certificate of issue licenses or permits, renew licenses or permits, and issue
temporary licenses permits to duly qualified applicants for licensure or certification
permit as clinical laboratory personnel and recommend to the board the denial,
suspension, probation, restriction, or revocation of licensure or certification to any
individual who violates the provisions of this Part.
(3) Recommend to the board rules and regulations which document the
appropriate training and competency of clinical laboratory personnel who are
engaged in the practice of clinical laboratory science in a clinical laboratory operated
by a physician licensed by the board exclusively in connection with the diagnosis
and treatment of his own patients. Such rules shall be based upon, and shall not
exceed, the scope and standards contained in the Clinical Laboratory Improvement
Amendments of 1988 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto
Recommend to the board for promulgation the minimum standards for the
accreditation of educational programs to instruct individuals training for all clinical
laboratory licenses and permits.
* * *
(10) Provide structured continuing education programs to assist clinical
laboratory personnel to qualify for advanced licensure in other licensure categories
and to fulfill the continuing education requirements for the following:
(a) Clinical Medical laboratory scientist-generalist scientist.
(b) Clinical Medical laboratory scientist-specialist scientist categorical.
(c) Clinical Medical laboratory scientist-technician technician.
(d) Cytotechnologist Cytologist.
(e) Laboratory assistant.
(f) Phlebotomist.
(11) Recommend criteria for applicants who must complete employment
requirements as in-training licensees to practice clinical laboratory science under
Page 8 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
supervision to be eligible for and successfully complete a nationally recognized
certification examination as approved by the board upon recommendation of the
committee.
* * *
(14) Annually publish and make available a register of all individuals
licensed or certified permitted under this Part, including the name and license or
certificate permit number of each licensee or certificate permit holder.
(15) Have all other powers necessary and proper to the performance of its
duties.
* * *
.§1318. Licensure and certification permitting; examination; application
A. No individual shall act as or perform the duties of a clinical medical
laboratory scientist-generalist scientist, clinical medical laboratory
scientist-specialist scientist categorical, clinical medical laboratory
scientist-technician technician, laboratory assistant, or cytotechnologist cytologist
unless that individual possesses a current license issued pursuant to this Part or is
exempt from the provisions of this Part. No individual shall act as or perform the
duties of a phlebotomist unless that individual possesses a current certificate permit
issued pursuant to this Part or is exempt from the provisions of this Part. Each
license or certificate shall be effective for the calendar year beginning January first
and ending December thirty-first in which it is issued.
B.(1) Each applicant for a license or certificate permit, except a laboratory
assistant, shall successfully complete an examination recommended or administered
by the committee and approved by the board, unless the applicant qualifies for
licensure without examination as provided in this Part. board.
* * *
C. Application for license or certification permit shall be on forms provided
by the committee and by means as prescribed by the board, shall be accompanied by
Page 9 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
the prescribed fee, and shall be issued for the laboratory personnel licensure category
for which the applicant qualifies.
D. An applicant may be licensed, or certified, licensed in each laboratory
personnel licensure category for which he the applicant duly qualifies.
E. A certificate or license, except a temporary license permit, shall be valid
for a period of one year as specified in the rules, unless suspended or revoked.
* * *
§§11.320. License or certificate permit renewal; waiver of renewals while in the
military
A. Each license or certificate permit shall be renewed annually, before
January first of each year, by forwarding to the board a renewal application on a
form recommended by the committee and adopted by the board accompanied by a
renewal fee as provided in this Part. Each licensee or certificate permit holder, upon
making application for renewal of a license or certificate permit, shall submit
evidence of fulfillment of continuing education requirements satisfactory to the
board.
B. The committee may recommend and the board may continue licensure or
certification permitting without application for renewal for any clinical laboratory
personnel licensed or certified permitted under in accordance with this Part while the
individual is in the active military service of the United States or any of its allies,
upon notification by the licensee or certificate permit holder to the committee of that
fact.
§1321. Fees; license, certification permit, renewal, delinquent
A.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection, the license fee
and the renewal fee, shall be as follows:
(a) Clinical Medical laboratory scientist (all categories) $ 50.00 60.00
(b) Cytotechnologist Cytologist $ 50.00 60.00
Page 10 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
(c) Laboratory assistant $ 25.00 30.00
(d) Phlebotomist $ 40.00
* * *
(3) (2) Fees collected by the board for licensure or certification permitting
and renewal to practice clinical laboratory science for calendar year 1997 and each
year thereafter shall be fixed by the board upon the recommendation of the
committee by rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act, not to exceed the amounts established in Paragraphs (1) and (2) of
this Subsection. Act.
B. A delinquent fee of not more than fifty dollars, in addition to the renewal
fee, shall be collected if a license or certificate permit is not renewed by February
first of each year.
C. The fee for issuing a duplicate license or certificate permit shall not
exceed ten twelve dollars.
D. An individual whose license or certificate permit has lapsed and who has
not been actively engaged in the practice of clinical laboratory science for not more
less than seven five years may have his license or certificate permit reinstated upon
payment of the renewal fee and the delinquent fee and submission of evidence
satisfactory to the board that he the applicant has fulfilled continuing education
requirements as promulgated by the board upon recommendation of the committee.
§1322. Temporary license permit; limited renewal; fee permit
A. An applicant for a license as a clinical medical laboratory
scientist-generalist scientist, clinical medical laboratory scientist-specialist scientist
categorical, clinical medical laboratory scientist-technician, technician, or
cytotechnologist cytologist who has fulfilled the educational qualifications to take
the licensing certification examination may be granted a temporary license permit
to engage in the practice of clinical laboratory science in the category for which he
the applicant is qualified until six weeks after the date of the next licensing
examination. In the event If the applicant for a license as a clinical medical
Page 11 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
laboratory scientist-generalist scientist, clinical medical laboratory
scientist-specialist scientist categorical, clinical medical laboratory
scientist-technician, technician, or cytotechnologist cytologist does not successfully
complete the licensing certification examination, that applicant's temporary license
may, at the discretion of the committee, be renewed once until six weeks after the
subsequent licensing examination. permit will expire six months after its issuance
and may not be renewed.
B. The fee for a temporary license permit shall be the fee required for the
category in which the license is issued corresponding license as governed by R.S.
37:1321, pro-rated for the portion of the year until the next license examination.
§1323. Qualifications of clinical medical laboratory scientist-generalist scientist;
clinical medical laboratory scientist-specialist scientist categorical; clinical
medical laboratory scientist-technician; technician; cytotechnologist;
cytologist; laboratory assistant; and phlebotomist
A. Each applicant for licensure as a clinical medical laboratory
scientist-generalist scientist shall meet one of the following requirements:
(1) Possess a baccalaureate degree from an accredited medical laboratory
science program, college or university, fulfill the educational requirements necessary
to enroll in a successfully complete an approved medical laboratory science program,
or its equivalent, in an approved school of medical technology laboratory science,
complete one year of full-time clinical laboratory experience, or its equivalent, in an
approved school of medical technology, and successfully complete and pass a
nationally recognized certification examination, examination as approved by the
board upon recommendation by the committee. The required year of full-time
clinical laboratory experience may be included in the curriculum for the
baccalaureate degree or may be post-graduate.
(2) Complete the educational, clinical, and employment experience
requirements, if any, educational requirements necessary to be eligible, for and
successfully complete pass a nationally recognized certification examination, all of
Page 12 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
which are approved by the board, and complete one year of full-time clinical
experience upon recommendation by the committee.
* * *
B. Each applicant for licensure as a clinical medical laboratory
scientist-specialist scientist categorical shall possess a doctoral, master, or
baccalaureate degree from an accredited college or university with a major in one of
the chemical, physical, chemical or biological sciences and shall complete the
educational, clinical, and employment experience requirements, if any, requirements
necessary to be eligible for and shall pass successfully complete a nationally
recognized certification examination in a laboratory specialty, all of which are
approved by the board upon recommendation by the committee.
C. Each applicant for licensure as a clinical medical laboratory
scientist-technician technician shall meet one of the following requirements:
(1) Successfully fulfill the requirements of an accredited educational
program for an associate degree in clinical medical laboratory science and
successfully complete pass a nationally recognized certification examination
approved by the board upon recommendation by the committee.
(2) Complete the educational, clinical, and employment experience
requirements, if any, educational requirements necessary to be eligible for, and pass
and successfully complete a nationally recognized certification examination, all of
which are approved by the board upon recommendation by the committee
examination approved by the board, and complete one year of full-time clinical
experience.
D. Each applicant for licensure as a cytotechnologist cytologist shall meet
one of the following requirements: possess a baccalaureate degree from an accredited
college or university, fulfill the educational requirements necessary to enroll in a
school of cytology, complete one full year of full-time cytology experience or its
equivalent in an approved school of cytology, and successfully complete a nationally
recognized certification examination approved by the board. The required year of
Page 13 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
full-time cytology experience may be included in the curriculum for the
baccalaureate degree or may be post-graduate.
* * *
E.(1) Each applicant for licensure as a laboratory assistant shall, at a
minimum, possess a high school diploma or its equivalent as approved by a state
department of education and document training as evidence of competency in basic
laboratory science or successfully complete a nationally recognized certification
examination recommended by the committee approved by the board. Prior to a
laboratory assistant performing a moderate complexity testing, he shall document to
his employer or laboratory director evidence of competency and training appropriate
for that specific testing shall be documented by a medical doctor, medical laboratory
scientist, or cytologist. Any documentation which satisfies the corresponding
qualifications of the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 shall
satisfy the documentation requirement of this Section.
* * *
F. Each applicant for certification as a phlebotomist permit shall meet one
of the following requirements: fulfill the training and competency requirements
necessary to be eligible for and successfully complete a certification examination.
* * *
§1324. License in training
A. The board upon the recommendation of the committee, shall may issue
a license in training to an individual who has not fulfilled the educational
requirements to take a license certification examination or needs to obtain full-time
comprehensive experience under supervision, or both, in any license category. A
license in training shall allow an individual to engage in the practice of clinical
laboratory science under supervision. The length of duration of each such license in
training, its renewal, if any, and the specific requirements for appropriate supervision
for each category of licensure shall be established by the board upon the
recommendation of the committee by the promulgation of rules and regulations. The
Page 14 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
fees for issuing a license in training for each category of licensure established by this
Part shall be governed by the provisions of R.S. 37:1321.
B. An applicant who is certified by a national certification agency
recognized by the board, but who has not engaged in the practice of clinical
laboratory science within the last ten five years and has not maintained the
continuing education requirements as approved by the board, upon recommendation
of the committee, shall be granted a license in training to engage in the practice of
clinical laboratory science in the category for which he is otherwise qualified until
the supervised retraining period and the continuing education requirements as
approved by the board are completed.
§1325. Issuance of license or certificate permit
If an applicant meets the requirements of this Part, the board shall issue the
applicant a license or certification permit to practice clinical laboratory science
within the specific category of licensure or certification permit for which the
applicant qualifies as defined in this Part.
§1326. Causes for denial, suspension, probation, restriction, or revocation of a
license or certification permit or license or certification permit renewal
A. The board, upon the recommendation of the committee, may deny,
suspend, probate, restrict, or revoke the issuance or renewal of a license or
certification permit, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, upon a preponderance of evidence showing any of the
following when such activity is not authorized by the provisions of this Part:
(1) Performing, attempting to perform, or permitting anyone to perform any
clinical laboratory procedure or category of procedures not authorized by license or
certification permit.
* * *
(10) Unprofessional conduct, which may be further defined and as defined
in rules promulgated by the board in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act, includes including but is not limited to the following:
Page 15 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
(a) Sexual or disruptive misconduct or disruptive behavior which manifests
as aberrant behavior, harassment, or both, through personal interaction with
physicians, employees, coworkers, hospital personnel, healthcare professionals,
patients, family members, or others, or which interferes with or could reasonably be
expected to interfere with the work of clinical laboratory personnel.
* * *
(g) Refusal to submit to an examination and inquiry by an examining
committee of physicians appointed by the board to inquire into the licensee's or
permittee's physical or mental fitness and ability to practice medical (clinical)
laboratory science with reasonable skill or safety to patients.
B. The board, upon the recommendation of the committee, board may
reinstate any license or certificate permit previously suspended, probated, restricted,
or revoked.
C. The board, upon the recommendation of the committee, or as a condition
of the reinstatement of any license or certificate permit suspended, probated,
restricted, or revoked, may require any licensee or certificate permit holder to pay
all costs of the committee or board proceedings, including any investigator, clerical,
or attorney's fees.
* * *
§1327. Penalties
Any individual who engages or attempts to engage in the practice of clinical
laboratory science who has not been licensed or certified in accordance with this Part
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subjected to the following penalties for
violation of any provision of this Part:
(1) For the first offense, the fine shall not be more than five six hundred
dollars.
(2) For the second offense, the fine shall not be more than one thousand two
hundred dollars.
Page 16 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2039 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1216
(3) For the third and each subsequent offense, the fine shall not be more than
two thousand four hundred dollars for each offense.
Section 2. R.S. 37:1313(C)(2) through (G), 1315(A)(4), (6), (12), (13), (16) and (17),
1321(A)(2), 1323(A)(3), (D)(1) through (3), (E)(2) and (3), and (F)(1) and (2) are hereby
repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. Any entity subject to accreditation by the provisions of this Act shall
have until August 1, 2028, to obtain accreditation in compliance with the provisions of this
Act. An entity that fails to obtain accreditation by August 1, 2028, shall be subject to
adverse action or penalties as provided for in law.